California, session 20252026, AB1960.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4124.9 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 4124.8, to read:4124.9. (a) (1) For purposes of this section, “identified cohesive fire community” means a community, as that term is defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 65302.10 of the Government Code, that has reached the applicable percent of homes certified by a home hardening certification program pursuant to the process described in paragraphs (2) and (3).(2) In order to qualify as an identified cohesive fire community, a community shall, until or unless a state agency develops a home hardening certification program, reach the following minimum percentage of homes certified pursuant to a home hardening certification program developed by an independent, independent 501(c)(3) nonprofit scientific research and communications organization supported by property insurers, reinsurers, and affiliated companies: (A) In the 2028–29 and 2029–30 fiscal years, 10 percent of homes certified as hardened. (B) In the 2030–31 to 2032–33 fiscal years, inclusive, 30 percent of homes certified as hardened.(C) In the 2033–34 and 2034–35 following fiscal years, 50 percent of homes certified as hardened.(3) If a state agency adopts a home hardening certification program, the agency shall, for purposes of certification as an identified cohesive fire community, adopt timeframes and minimum percentage thresholds that are comparable to the timeframes and minimum percentage thresholds described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (2).(4) Upon the development of a home hardening certification program by a state agency as described in paragraph (3), a community that was previously qualified certified as an identified cohesive fire community by meeting the thresholds described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of pursuant to paragraph (2) pursuant to certification conducted pursuant to any home hardening certification program developed by an independent, 501(c)(3) nonprofit scientific research and communications organization supported by property insurers, reinsurers, and affiliated companies, shall retain that qualification.(5) For purposes of this subdivision, state and private certification programs shall base certification upon objective, verifiable, and periodically reviewed wildfire mitigation criteria supported by publicly available methodology and data.(b) The department may, commencing with the 2028–29 fiscal year, disburse funds appropriated for the department’s Wildfire Prevention Grants Program to identified cohesive fire communities that partner with fire safe councils, consistent with subdivision (c), to use for activities related to hazardous fuels reduction, wildfire prevention planning, and wildfire prevention education, among other activities.(c) For purposes of the funding described in subdivision (b), a fire safe council shall be both of the following: (1) The entity that applies to the department for grant funding. The application shall be on behalf of an individual or group of individuals affiliated with an identified cohesive fire community.(2) The entity that receives and manages any grant funding awarded to an identified cohesive fire community pursuant to the Wildfire Prevention Grants Program. The fire safe council shall determine how to use the funds in the identified cohesive fire safe community for hazardous fuels reduction, wildfire prevention planning, and wildfire prevention education, among other activities.(d)The department shall, commencing with the 2028–29 fiscal year, prioritize disadvantaged(d) Disadvantaged identified cohesive fire communities in its shall be awarded preference pursuant to the department’s established procedures for prioritizing disadvantaged applicants in their evaluation of applicants for the Wildfire Prevention Grants Program.(e) Qualification as an identified cohesive fire community pursuant to this section shall not be used for purposes of the business of insurance, and shall not establish actuarial justification for insurance rate adjustments, catastrophe model modifications, underwriting changes, or mitigation credits absent supporting empirical and statistical evidence.